Utah statutes.
70A-4-214.   Right of charge-back or refund -- Liability of collecting bank
-- Return of item.
(1)  If a collecting bank has made provisional settlement with its customer
for an item and fails by reason of dishonor, suspension of payments by a bank,
or otherwise to receive settlement for the item which is or becomes final, the
bank may revoke the settlement given by it, charge back the amount of any
credit given for the item to its customer's account, or obtain refund from its
customer, whether or not it is able to return the item, if by its midnight
deadline or within a longer reasonable time after it learns the facts it
returns the item or sends notification of the facts.  If the return or notice
is delayed beyond the bank's midnight deadline or a longer reasonable time
after it learns the facts, the bank may revoke the settlement, charge back the
credit, or obtain refund from its customer, but it is liable for any loss
resulting from the delay.  These rights to revoke, charge-back, and obtain
refund terminate if and when a settlement for the item received by the bank is
or becomes final.
(2)  A collecting bank returns an item when it is sent or delivered to the
bank's customers or transferor or pursuant to its instructions.
(3)  A depositary bank that is also the payor may charge back the amount of an
item to its customer's account or obtain refund in accordance with the section
governing return of an item received by a payor bank for credit on its books,
Section 70A-4-301.
(4)  The right to charge back is not affected by:
(a)  previous use of a credit given for the item; or
(b)  failure by any bank to exercise ordinary care with respect to the item,
but a bank so failing remains liable.
(5)  A failure to charge-back or claim refund does not affect other rights of
the bank against the customer or any other party.
(6)  If credit is given in dollars as the equivalent of the value of an item
payable in a foreign money, the dollar amount of any charge-back or refund
must be calculated on the basis of the bank-offered spot rate for the foreign
money prevailing on the day when the person entitled to the charge-back or
refund learns that it will not receive payment in ordinary course.
